District of Columbia statutes.
6-1403.01

Construction Codes database.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish and maintain a searchable electronic database available through the Internet that, at a minimum, contains the Construction Codes Supplement, set forth in Title 12 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, and any amendments made thereto, to the:

(1)

BOCA National Building Code/1996;

(2)

International Plumbing Code/1995;

(a)

The Mayor shall establish and maintain a searchable electronic database available through the Internet that, at a minimum, contains the Construction Codes Supplement, set forth in Title 12 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, and any amendments made thereto, to the:

(3)

International Mechanical Code/1996;

(4)

BOCA National Fire Prevention Code/1996;

(5)

BOCA National Property Maintenance Code/1996;

(6)

Council of American Building Officials One and Two Family Dwelling Code/1995;

(7)

National Fire Protection Association National Electrical Code/1996; and

(8)

Building Rehabilitation Code.

(b)

The Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs shall make the information in the database available to any person.

History

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 4a
as added June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-162, § 101, 49 DCR 4438

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-1410.

Temporary Legislation

Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 19-181 repealed this section.
Section 8 of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.
Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that sections 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of the act shall apply upon the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property pursuant to section 2 of the act.
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 19-181 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3(b) of the Sign Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-387, July 11, 2012, 59 DCR 8491).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 3(b) of the Sign Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-499, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12749), applicable after the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property, and with the condition that any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.

Editor's Notes

Section 301 of D.C. Law 14-162 provided: “Pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.”

Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 19-289 would have repealed this section.

Section 9 of D.C. Law 19-289 provided: “Any order, rule, or regulation in effect under a law replaced by this act shall remain in effect until repealed, amended, or superseded.”

Section 10 of D.C. Law 19-289 provided: “Applicability. Sections 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, and 8 shall not apply until the Mayor’s issuance of a comprehensive final rulemaking governing signs on public space and private property pursuant to section 2.”